Utah statutes.
19-1-104.   Creation of department -- Appointment of executive director.

(1)  There is created within state government the Department of Environmental Quality.  The department shall be administered by an executive director.

(2)  The executive director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

(3)  The executive director shall have demonstrated the necessary administrative and professional ability through education and experience to efficiently and effectively manage the department's affairs.

(4)  The Legislature shall fix the compensation of the executive director in accordance with Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.

